Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-987
Department; powers and duties.

(1) The department may submit claims for federal financial participation for the expenditures for the services described in subsection (2) of section 68-986 that are allowable expenditures under federal law.

(2) The department may annually submit any necessary materials to the federal government to provide assurances that claims for federal financial participation will include only those expenditures that are allowable under federal law.

(3) If either a final judicial determination is made by any court of appellate jurisdiction or a final determination is made by the administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that the supplemental reimbursement provided for in the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act shall be made to any provider not described in this section, the chief executive officer of the department shall execute a declaration stating that the determination has been made and such supplemental reimbursement becomes inoperative on the date of such determination.

Laws 2017, LB578, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB380, § 5.